dictsource/ct_rules
// ***************************************************************************/ 
// *   Crimean Tatar Language ct ct_rules                                    *
// *   Original Author: Andiv06                                              *
// *   E-mail adress: andyvladescu534@gmail.com                              *
// ***************************************************************************/
// *   This program is free software; you can redistribute it and/or modify  *
// *   it under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by  *
// *   the Free Software Foundation; either version 3 of the License, or     *
// *   (at your option) any later version.                                   *
// *                                                                         *
// *   This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,       *
// *   but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of        *
// *   MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the         *
// *   GNU General Public License for more details.                          *
// *                                                                         *
// *   You should have received a copy of the GNU General Public License     *
// *   along with this program; if not, see:                                 *
// *               <http://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.                           *
// ***************************************************************************/

// This file is UTF8 encoded 
// Spelling to phoneme rules for Crimean Tatar
.group а
        а        a:

.group б
        б        b

.group в
        в        w   // [v] in Russian words

.group г
        г        g 
        
.group ғ
        ғ        G // changes to [Q] or [Q"]

.group д
        д        d

.group е
        е        je
       

.group ё
        ё        jo

.group ж
        ж        Z

.group з
        з        z

.group и
        и        i

.group й
        й        j

.group к
        к        k
        
.group къ
         къ      q          

.group л
        л        L

.group м
        м        m

.group н
        н        n

.group ң
        ң        N

.group о
        о        o

.group ө
        ө        W

.group п
        п        p

.group р
        р        r

.group с
        с        s

.group т
        т        t

.group у
        у        u   

.group ү
        ү        y  
  
.group ф
        ф        f

.group х
        х        x

.group дж
         дж      dZ

.group ц
        ц        ts

.group ч
        ч        tS

.group ш
        ш        S

.group щ
        щ        S;

.group ъ
        ъ        ?

.group ы
        ы        Y

.group ь
        ь        ?

.group э
        э        e|:

.group ю
        ю        ju   

.group я
        я        ja   

.group $
        $        doL'aR
